Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-101
Jurisdiction.

All impeachments of state officers shall be tried before the Supreme Court, except that the impeachment of a judge of the Supreme Court shall be tried before the Court of Appeals sitting en banc.

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 82;

R.S.1913, § 1128;

C.S.1922, § 1057;

C.S.1929, § 27-101;

R.S.1943, § 24-101;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 28.

An impeachment must be tried by the Supreme Court. State v. Douglas, 217 Neb. 199, 349 N.W.2d 870 (1984).

Trial of impeachments before Supreme Court is a judicial investigation according to judicial methods. State v. Hastings, 37 Neb. 96, 55 N.W. 774 (1893).